Utah statutes.
73-18a-11.   Regulation by political subdivisions prohibited -- Exception.
Through the passage of this chapter, the state fully reserves to itself the
exclusive right to establish requirements concerning the disposal of human
body waste and litter from a vessel. To ensure statewide uniformity of the
disposal of litter or human body waste from a vessel, regulation, other than
the adoption for local enforcement of state rules, by any political
subdivision of the state is prohibited.
